California statutes. Insurance Code
 section shall not apply to a health care benefit plan or policy entered into with the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System pursuant to the Public Employees’ Medical and Hospital Care Act (Part 5 (commencing with Section 22750) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code) until July 1, 2027.

(i) (1) Until January 1, 2027, the commissioner may issue guidance regarding compliance with this section, and that guidance shall not be subject to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(2) The department shall consult with the Department of Managed Health Care and stakeholders in issuing the guidance specified in paragraph (1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 243, Sec. 9.   (SB 862)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10119.7.

No group or individual policy of disability insurance which covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses shall be issued, amended, delivered, or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 1981, if it contains any exclusion, reduction, or other limitations, as to coverage, deductibles, or coinsurance provisions applicable solely to conditions attributable to diethylstilbestrol or exposure to diethylstilbestrol.

All policies subject to this section and issued, amended, delivered, or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 1981, shall be construed to be in compliance with this section, and any provision in any such policy which is in conflict with this section shall be of no force or effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 776, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10119.8.

On and after January 1, 1993, every insurer issuing, amending, or renewing a policy of individual or group disability insurance that covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses shall offer coverage for screening for blood lead levels for covered children. This section shall not apply to specified accident, specified disease, hospital indemnity, Medicare supplement, or long-term care health insurance policies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 797, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10119.9.

(a) A disability insurance policy or certificate covering hospital, surgical, or medical expenses, that meets the definition of “health benefit plan” in subdivision (a) of Section 10198.6, that is issued, amended, renewed, or delivered on or after January 1, 2000, shall be deemed to cover general anesthesia and associated facility charges for dental procedures rendered in a hospital or surgery center setting, when the clinical status or underlying medical condition of the insured requires dental procedures that ordinarily would not require general anesthesia to be rendered in a hospital or surgery center setting. The disability insurance policy or certificate may require prior authorization of general anesthesia and associated charges required for dental care procedures in the same manner that prior authorization is required for other covered diseases or conditions.

(b) This section shall apply only to general anesthesia and associated facility charges for only the following insureds, and only if the insureds meet the criteria in subdivision (a):

(1) Insureds who are under seven years of age.

(2) Insureds who are developmentally disabled, regardless of age.

(3) Insureds whose health is compromised and for whom general anesthesia is medically necessary, regardless of age.

(c) Nothing in this section shall require insurers to cover any charges for the dental procedure itself, including the professional fee of the dentist. Coverage for anesthesia and associated facility charges pursuant to this section shall be subject to all other terms and conditions of the policy or certificate that apply generally to other benefits.

(d) Nothing in this section shall require insurers to cover anesthesia or related facility charges for dental procedures that ordinarily would require general anesthesia and that do not meet the requirements of subdivision (a), (b), or (c).

(e) A disability insurance policy may include coverage specified in subdivision (a) at any time prior to January 1, 2000.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 790, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

10120.

If a policy of disability insurance issued, issued for delivery, or renewed in this state after the effective date of this section provides in any manner for payment of all or part of the cost of a “sterilization operation or procedure” any exclusion, reduction, or limitation on such a benefit based upon the reason, or reasons, of the covered persons for requesting such sterilization shall be void and of no effect.

All disability policies issued, issued for delivery, or renewed in this state after effective date of this section shall be automatically construed to be in compliance with this section and need not be refiled or reprinted.

As used in this code, “sterilization operations or procedures” shall include and mean any operation or procedure altering the human body which has as its purpose, or one of its purposes, the temporary or permanent prevention of procreation by either a male or a female.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

10120.2.

(a) This section shall only apply to a disability insurer that issues a dental insurance policy pursuant to this part.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Coordination of benefits” means the method by which a disability insurer and one or more other disability insurers, health care service plans covering dental services, or specialized health care service plans, covering dental services, pay their respective reimbursements for dental benefits when an insured is covered by multiple disability insurers, or a combination of disability insurers and health care service plans or specialized health care service plans.

(2) “Primary dental benefit plan” means a dental insurance policy issued by a disability insurer regulated pursuant to this part or a health care service plan or specialized health care service plan contract regulated pursuant to Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code that provides an insured or enrollee with primary dental coverage.

(3) “Secondary dental benefit plan” means a dental insurance policy issued by a disability insurer regulated pursuant to this part or a health care service plan or specialized health care service plan contract regulated pursuant to Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code that provides an insured or enrollee with secondary dental coverage.

(c) A disability insurer that issues a dental insurance policy shall declare its coordination of benefits policy prominently in its evidence of coverage or insurance policy with both insured and policyholder.

(d) When a primary dental benefit plan is coordinating its benefits with one or more secondary dental benefit plans, it shall pay the maximum amount required by its policy with the insured or policyholder.

(e) A disability insurer that issues a dental insurance policy, when acting as a secondary dental benefit plan or insurer, shall pay the lesser of either the amount it would have paid in the absence of any other dental benefit coverage, or the insured’s total out-of-pocket cost payable under the primary dental benefit plan for benefits covered under the secondary plan or policy.

(f) Nothing in this section is intended to conflict with or modify the way in which a disability insurer that issues a dental insurance policy determines which dental benefit plan is primary and which is secondary in coordinating benefits with another insurer or plan pursuant to existing state law or regulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 164, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

10120.3.

(a) With respect to a contract between an insurer covering dental services and a dentist to provide covered dental services to insureds, the contract shall not require a dentist to accept an amount set by the insurer as payment for dental care services provided to an insured that are not covered services under the insured’s policy. This subdivision shall only apply to provider contracts issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2011.

(b) A provider shall not charge more for dental services that are not covered services under a health insurance policy than his or her usual and customary rate for those services. The department shall not be required to enforce this subdivision.

(c) The evidence of coverage and disclosure form, or combined evidence of coverage and disclosure form, for every health insurance policy covering dental services, or specialized health insurance policy covering dental services, that is issued, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2011, shall include the following statement:

IMPORTANT: If you opt to receive dental services that are not covered services under this policy, a participating dental provider may charge you his or her usual and customary rate for those services. Prior to providing a patient with dental services that are not a covered benefit, the dentist should provide to the patient a treatment plan that includes each anticipated service to be provided and the estimated cost of each service. If you would like more information about dental coverage options, you may call member
 services at [insert appropriate telephone number] or your insurance broker. To fully understand your coverage, you may wish to carefully review this evidence of coverage document.

(d) For purposes of this section, “covered services” or “covered dental services” means dental care services for which the insurer is obligated to pay pursuant to an insured’s policy, or for which the insurer would be obligated to pay pursuant to an insured’s policy but for the application of contractual limitations such as deductibles, copayments, coinsurance, waiting periods, annual or lifetime maximums, frequency limitations, or alternative benefit payments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 188.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10120.35.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a health insurer, including a specialized health insurer and a health insurer that issues, sells, renews, or offers a contract covering dental services, shall reimburse its contracting health care providers for business expenses to prevent the spread of diseases causing public health emergencies declared on or after January 1, 2022. For purposes of this subdivision, “business expenses” means personal protective equipment, additional supplies, materials, and clinical staff time over and above those expenses usually included in an office visit or other nonfacility service or services if performed during a public health emergency, as defined by law, due to respiratory-transmitted infectious
 disease and pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) A health insurer shall reimburse a contracting health care provider pursuant to subdivision (a) for each individual patient encounter, limited to one encounter per day per insured for the duration of the public health emergency.

(c) The department shall ensure a health insurer provides timely reimbursement to its contracting health care providers pursuant to subdivision (a). The department may adopt guidance to implement this section. The guidance shall not be subject to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(d) For purposes of this section, “contracting health care provider”
 means a physician and surgeon, dentist, or doctor of podiatric medicine who is licensed by the state to deliver or furnish health care services, who owns or operates a practice, and who is contracted with the insured’s health insurer. The term “contracting health care provider” only applies to a dentist if the insured is covered by a health insurance policy or specialized health insurance policy that includes dental benefits.

(e) This section does not apply to the state of emergency declared by the Governor on March 4, 2020, relating to the coronavirus 2019 (COVID-19) pandemic.

(f) This section shall not apply to a Medi-Cal managed care plan that contracts with the State Department of Health Care Services pursuant to Chapter 7
 (commencing with Section 14000) of, Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) of, or Chapter 8.75 (commencing with Section 14591) of, Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 538, Sec. 2.   (SB 242)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10120.4.

(a) A health insurer that issues, sells, renews, or offers a policy covering dental services, including a specialized policy of health insurance covering dental services, or a contracting entity may grant a third party access to a provider network contract, or a provider’s dental services or contractual discounts provided pursuant to a provider network contract if the requirements of subdivisions (b) and (c) are met.

(b) A health insurer that issues, sells, renews, or offers a policy covering dental services may grant a third party access to a provider network contract if, at the time the
 provider network contract is entered into, and at any time a notice is sent to a health care provider as required pursuant to Section 10133.65, the provider network contract allows a provider to choose not to participate in third-party access to the provider network contract. The third-party access provision of the provider network contract shall be clearly identified. An insurer shall not
 grant third-party access to the provider network contract of a provider that does not participate in third-party access to the
 provider network contract.

(c) A contracting entity may grant a third party access to a provider network contract, or a provider’s dental services or contractual discounts provided pursuant to a provider network contract, if all of the following are met:

(1) The provider network contract specifically states that the contracting entity may enter into an agreement with a third party that would allow the third party to obtain the contracting entity’s rights and responsibilities as if the third party were the contracting entity, and when the contracting entity is a health insurer, the provider chose to participate in third-party access at the time the provider network contract
 was entered into.

(2) If the contracting entity is a health insurer, the third-party access provision of the provider network contract shall clearly identify in the contract and notice to the provider, as required pursuant to Section 10133.65, the following language conspicuously placed on the first page of the document in 12-point underlined type:

This contract grants third-party access to the provider network. The provider network contracting entity has entered into an agreement with other dental
 insurers or third parties that allows the third party to obtain the contracting entity’s rights and responsibilities as if the third party were the contracting entity. The list of all third parties with access to this provider network can be found at (insert internet website as identified in paragraph (4)). You have the right to choose not to participate in third-party access. To exercise your right to not participate in the third-party access, submit your written or electronic request to the health insurer.

(3) The contracting entity identifies prior to signing the contract, in writing or electronic format to the provider, all third parties in existence as of the date the
 provider network contract is entered
 into.

(4) The contracting entity identifies all third parties in existence in a list on its internet website that is updated at least once every 90 days.

(5) (A) The contracting entity requires a third party to identify the source of the discount on all written or electronic remittance advices or explanations of payment under which a discount is taken.

(B) This paragraph does not apply to electronic transactions mandated by the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191).

(6) A third party’s right to a provider’s discounted rate ceases
 as of the termination date of the provider network contract.

(7) The contracting entity makes available a copy of the provider network contract relied on in the adjudication of a claim to a participating provider within 30 days of a request from the provider.

(d) A provider is not bound by or required to perform dental treatment or services under a provider network contract granted to a third party in violation of this section.

(e) This section does not apply if any of the following criteria are met:

(1) The provider network contract is for dental services provided to a beneficiary of the federal Medicare Program pursuant to Title XVIII of
 the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395 et seq.) or the federal Medicaid program pursuant to Title XIX of the
 federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.).

(2) Access to a provider network contract is granted to a health insurer that issues, sells, renews, or offers a policy covering dental services or a contracting entity operating under the same brand licensee program as the contracting entity.

(3) Access to a provider network contract is granted to an affiliate of a contracting entity. A list of the contracting entity’s affiliates shall be made available to a provider in writing or electronic form before access is granted to a third party pursuant to subdivision (b).

(f) The commissioner shall adopt regulations as are necessary to implement and enforce this section in accordance with the rulemaking
 provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(g) As used in this section:

(1) “Contracting entity” means a person or entity that enters into direct contracts with providers for the delivery of dental services in the ordinary course of business, including a health insurer or third-party administrator.

(2) “Dental services” means services for the diagnosis, prevention, treatment, or cure of a dental condition, illness, injury, or disease. “Dental services” does not include services delivered by a provider that are billed as
 medical expenses under a policy of health insurance.

(3) “Provider” means an individual or entity that provides dental services or supplies, as defined by the policy of health insurance or specialized policy of health insurance, including a dentist or physician, but not a physician organization that leases or rents its network to a third party.

(4) “Provider network contract” means a contract between a contracting entity and a provider entered into on or after January 1, 2020, that specifies the rights and responsibilities of the contracting entity and provides for the delivery and payment of dental
 services to an insured.

(5) “Third party” means a person or entity that enters into a contract with a contracting entity or with another third party to gain access to the dental services or contractual discounts of a provider network contract. “Third party” does not include an employer or other group for whom the health insurer or contracting entity provides administrative services, including the payment of claims.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 540, Sec. 2.   (AB 954)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10120.41.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Dental waiting period provision” means a health insurance policy provision that limits coverage for a specified period of time following an insured’s effective date of coverage.

(2) “Health insurer” means an insurer that issues, sells, renews, or offers a policy of health insurance, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 106, covering dental services, including a specialized health insurance policy covering dental services, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 106.

(3) “Preexisting condition provision” means a policy provision that excludes or limits coverage for services, charges, or expenses incurred following an insured’s effective date of coverage for a condition for which dental services, diagnosis, care, or treatment was recommended or received preceding the effective date of coverage.

(b) On and after January 1, 2025, a health insurer shall not issue, sell, renew, or offer a policy that imposes a dental waiting period provision in a large group dental insurance policy or preexisting condition provision upon an insured for any dental insurance policy.

(c) This section does not apply to Medi-Cal dental managed care contracts authorized under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) and Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 557, Sec. 4.   (AB 1048)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10120.42.

(a) To assist a provider in determining if an insured’s dental coverage is regulated by the State of California, the health insurer shall disclose whether the insured’s dental coverage is “State Regulated” through a provider portal, if available, or otherwise upon request, on or after January 1, 2025.

(b) A health insurer shall include the statement “State Regulated” if the insured’s dental coverage is subject to regulation by the department, on
 an electronic or physical identification card, or both if available, for policies covering dental services issued on or after January 1, 2025. 

(c) For purposes of this section, “health insurer” means a health insurer that issues, sells, renews, or offers a policy covering dental services, including a specialized health insurer covering dental services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 125, Sec. 2.   (AB 952)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10120.5.

Any act by a disability insurer that covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses that violates Section 510, Section 2056, or Section 2056.1 of the Business and Professions Code shall also be a violation of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1094, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10121.

(a) No self-insured employee welfare benefit plan, issued or renewed on or after November 23, 1970, which contains coverage for sterilization operations or procedures, shall impose any disclaimer, restriction on, or limitation of, coverage relative to the covered individual’s reason for sterilization. All those plans entered into or renewed on or after November 23, 1970, shall be construed to be in compliance with this section, and any provision in any plan which is in conflict with this section shall be of no force or effect.

(b) Every self-insured employee welfare benefit plan issued or amended on or after July 1, 1972, which provides benefits to the employee’s dependents, shall contain a provision granting immediate accident and sickness coverage, from and after the moment of birth, to each newborn infant of any family covered and to each minor child placed for adoption from and after the moment the child is placed in the physical custody of the covered family for adoption. No plan may be issued or amended if it contains any disclaimer, waiver, or other limitation of coverage relative to the coverage or insurability of newborn infants of or minor children placed for adoption with a family covered as required by this section. Coverage of minor children placed for adoption with a covered family shall be required only after January 1, 1988.

(c) No self-insured employee welfare benefit plan which provides maternity benefits for a person covered continuously from conception shall be issued, amended, delivered, or renewed in this state on or after July 1, 1976, if it contains any exclusion, reduction, or other limitations as to coverage, deductibles, or coinsurance provisions as to involuntary complications of pregnancy, unless those provisions apply generally to all benefits paid under the plan. If a fixed amount is specified in the plan for surgery, the fixed amounts for surgical procedures involving involuntary complications of pregnancy shall be commensurate with other fixed amounts payable for procedures of comparable difficulty and severity. In a case where a fixed amount is payable for maternity benefits, involuntary complications of pregnancy shall be deemed an illness and entitled to benefits otherwise provided by the plan. Where the plan contains a maternity deductible, the maternity deductible shall apply only to expenses resulting from normal delivery and cesarean section delivery. However, expenses for cesarean section delivery in excess of the deductible shall be treated as expenses for any other illness under the plan. This subdivision shall apply to all self-insured employee welfare benefit plans except any plan made subject to an applicable collective bargaining agreement in effect before July 1, 1976.

For purposes of this subdivision, involuntary complications of pregnancy shall include, but not be limited to, puerperal infection, eclampsia, cesarean section delivery, ectopic pregnancy, and toxemia.

All plans subject to this subdivision and issued, amended, delivered, or renewed in this state on or after July 1, 1976, shall be construed to be in compliance with this section, and any provision in any plan which is in conflict with this section shall be of no force or effect.

(d) Every self-insured employee welfare benefit plan issued or amended on or after January 1, 1987, which provides benefits to the employee’s dependents, shall offer a choice to all employees of coverage for comprehensive preventive health care for children.

(e) For purposes of this section, benefits for the comprehensive preventive care of children shall be consistent with the Guidelines for Health Supervision of Children and Youth, as adopted by the American Academy of Pediatrics in May 1982, and provide for the following:

(1) Physician service for routine physical examinations.

(2) Immunizations.

(3) Laboratory services in connection with routine physical examinations.

(f) As used in this section, “self-insured employee welfare benefit plan” means any plan or program of benefits provided by an employer or an employee organization, or both, for the purpose of providing hospital, medical, surgical, nursing, or dental services, or indemnification for the costs incurred for those services, to the employer’s employees or their dependents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 160, Sec. 118.)
-------------------------------------------

10121.5.

(a) When spouses are both employed as employees, and both have enrolled themselves and their eligible family members under a group policy of disability insurance provided by their respective employers, and each spouse is covered as an employee under the terms of the same master policy, each spouse may claim on his or her behalf, or on behalf of his or her enrolled dependents, the combined maximum contractual benefits to which an employee is entitled under the terms of the master policy, not to exceed in the aggregate 100 percent of the charge for the covered expense or service.

(b) When spouses are both employed as employees, and both have enrolled themselves and their eligible
 family members under a self-insured employee welfare benefit plan provided by their respective employers, and each spouse is covered as an employee under the terms of the same master contract, each spouse may claim on his or her behalf, or on behalf of his or her enrolled dependents, the combined maximum contractual benefits to which an employee is entitled under the terms of the master contract, not to exceed in the aggregate 100 percent of the charge for the covered expense or service.

(c) This section shall apply to every group disability insurance policy and self-insured employee welfare benefit plan which is entered into, issued, delivered, amended, or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 1978.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 58.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10121.6.

(a) No policy of group disability insurance or self-insured employee welfare benefit plan which provides hospital, medical, or surgical expense benefits for employees, insureds, or policyholders and their dependents shall exclude a dependent child from eligibility or benefits solely because the dependent child does not reside with the employee, insured, or policyholder.

(b) Each policy of group disability insurance or self-insured employee welfare benefit plan which provides hospital, medical, or surgical expense benefits for employees, insureds, or policyholders and their dependents shall enroll, upon application by the employer or group administrator, a dependent child of the noncustodial parent when that parent is the employee, insured, or policyholder at any time either the parent or the person having custody of the child as defined in Section 3751.5 of the Family Code, or the local child support agency makes an application for enrollment to the employer or group administrator when a court order for medical support exists. In the case of children who are eligible for medicaid, the State Department of Health Services may also make that application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 109.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

10121.7.

(a) A policy of group health insurance that provides hospital, medical, or surgical expense benefits shall provide equal coverage to employers or guaranteed associations, as defined in Section 10700, for the registered domestic partner of an employee, insured, or policyholder to the same extent, and subject to the same terms and conditions, as provided to a spouse of the employee, insured, or policyholder, and shall inform employers and guaranteed associations of this coverage. A policy shall not offer or provide coverage for a registered domestic partner that is not equal to the coverage provided to the spouse of an employee, insured, or policyholder, and shall not discriminate in coverage between spouses or domestic partners of a different sex
 and spouses or domestic partners of the same sex. The prohibitions and requirements imposed by this section are in addition to any other prohibitions and requirements imposed by law.

(b) If an employer or guaranteed association has purchased coverage for spouses and registered domestic partners pursuant to subdivision (a), a health insurer that provides hospital, medical, or surgical expense benefits for employees, insureds, or policyholders and their spouses shall enroll, upon application by the employer or group administrator, a registered domestic partner of the employee, insured, or policyholder in accordance with the terms and conditions of the group contract that apply generally to all spouses under the policy, including coordination of benefits.

(c) For purposes of this section, the term “domestic partner” shall have the same meaning as that term is used in Section 297 of
 the Family Code.

(d) (1) A policy of group health insurance may require that the employee, insured, or policyholder verify the status of the domestic partnership by providing to the insurer a copy of a valid Declaration of Domestic Partnership filed with the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 298 of the Family Code or an equivalent document issued by a local agency of this state, another state, or a local agency of another state under which the partnership was created. The policy may also require that the employee, insured, or policyholder notify the insurer upon the termination of the domestic partnership.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a policy may require the information described in that paragraph only if it also requests from the employee, insured, or policyholder whose spouse is provided coverage, verification of marital status and notification
 of dissolution of the marriage.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to expand the requirements of Section 4980B of Title 26 of the United States Code, Section 1161, and following, of Title 29 of the United States Code, or Section 300bb-1, and following, of Title 42 of the United States Code, as added by the Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985 (Public Law 99-272), and as those provisions may be later amended.

(f) A group health insurance policy subject to this section that is issued, amended, delivered, or renewed in this state on or after January 2, 2005, shall be deemed to provide coverage for registered domestic partners that is equal to the coverage provided to a spouse of an employee, insured, or policyholder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 722, Sec. 4.   (SB 757)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10122.

If a policy of group disability insurance issued or issued for delivery or amended in this state after the effective date of this section provides in any manner for coverage for an employee and one or more covered persons dependent upon such employee and provides for an extension of coverage for any period following a termination of employment of the employee, the policy shall provide that such extension of coverage shall apply to dependents upon the same terms and conditions precedent as applied to the covered employee, for the same period of time, subject to payment of premiums, if any, as required by the terms of the policy and subject to any applicable collective bargaining agreement.

All such group disability policies issued or issued for delivery or amended in this state after the effective date of this section shall be automatically construed to be in compliance with this section and need not be refiled or reprinted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 40.)
-------------------------------------------

10122.1.

On and after the effective date of this section, every policy of disability insurance which covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses on a group basis shall offer coverage to physically handicapped individual members of the group under the same terms and conditions as are normally offered to individual members of the group without physical handicap. The availability of such coverage shall be communicated to group policyholders and to prospective group policyholders during negotiations. Group policies shall not be required to cover hospital, medical, or surgical expenses arising as a direct result of an individual member’s physical handicap.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 10123.1 (as added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 964) by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676, Sec. 188.)
-------------------------------------------

10122.2.

If a policy of group disability insurance issued, delivered, amended, or renewed in this state on or after the effective date of this section provides in any manner for coverage for an employee and a covered spouse dependent upon such employee, the policy shall not provide for coverage under conditions less favorable for employees than coverage provided for covered spouses dependent upon the employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 59.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.

(a) No self-insured employee welfare benefit plan, issued or renewed on or after the effective date of this section, which provides coverage for an employee and one or more covered persons dependent upon such employee and provides for an extension of coverage for any period following a termination of employment of the employee, shall fail to provide that such extension of coverage shall apply to dependents upon the same terms and conditions precedent as applied to the covered employee, for the same period of time, subject to payment of premiums, if any, as required by the terms of the policy and subject to any limitations or conditions set forth in any applicable collective-bargaining agreement. All such plans entered into or renewed on or after the effective date of this section shall be construed to be in compliance with this section, and any provision in any such plan which is in conflict with this section shall be of no force or effect.

(b) A plan contract which provides benefits that accrue after a certain time of confinement in a health care facility shall specify what constitutes a day of confinement or the number of consecutive hours of confinement which are requisite to the commencement of benefits.

(c) As used in subdivisions (a) and (b), “self-insured employee welfare benefit plan” has the same meaning as that specified in subdivision (d) of Section 10121.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 648.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.1.

Every self-insured employee welfare benefit plan, as defined in Section 10121, issued, amended as to benefits, or renewed after January 1, 1977, shall comply with the requirements of Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 10128) of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.2.

On and after the effective date of this section, every self-insured employee welfare benefit plan which provides coverage for hospital, medical, or surgical expenses shall offer coverage to physically handicapped persons for such expenses incurred, under such terms and conditions as are normally provided by the self-insured welfare benefit plan and a member without physical handicap. Every self-insured welfare benefit plan shall communicate the availability of such coverage to all members and prospective members. The self-insured welfare benefit plan shall not be required to cover hospital, medical, or surgical expenses arising as a direct result of a physically disabled person’s handicap.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.3.

(a) No self-insured employee welfare benefit plan shall refuse to enroll any person or accept any person as a subscriber or renew any person as a subscriber after appropriate application on the basis of a person’s genetic characteristics that may, under some circumstances, be associated with disability in that person or that person’s offspring. No plan shall require a higher rate or charge, or offer or provide different terms, conditions, or benefits, on the basis of a person’s genetic characteristics that may, under some circumstances, be associated with disability in that person or that person’s offspring than is at the time required of any other individual in an otherwise identical classification, nor shall any plan make or require any rebate, discrimination, or discount upon the amount to be paid or the service to be rendered under the plan because the person carries those traits.

(b) No self-insured employee welfare benefit plan shall seek information about a person’s genetic characteristics for any nontherapeutic purpose.

(c) No discrimination shall be made in the fees or commissions of a solicitor or solicitor firm for an enrollment or a subscription or the renewal of an enrollment or subscription of any person on the basis of a person’s genetic characteristics that may, under some circumstances, be associated with disability in that person or that person’s offspring.

(d) “Genetic characteristics” as used in this section means either of the following:
